Hawaii statutes.
[§321-21] Infectious wastes; management and
disposal. The department of health shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter
91 for the management and disposal of infectious wastes generated by hospitals,
clinics, other health care facilities, doctors' offices, dentists' offices,
research laboratories, veterinary clinics, and other generators of infectious
wastes. The rules shall include a definition of infectious wastes that clearly
and objectively defines infectious wastes and specifies acceptable containers and
other factors related to the identification, segregation, containment, and
transportation of infectious wastes. Effective July 1, 1991, all
generators of infectious wastes shall show proof that infectious wastes are
being managed and disposed of according to departmental rules upon request of
the department. [L 1989, c 258, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next